District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.82

Establishment of the Captive Insurance Agency.

(a)

There is established, as a subordinate agency, the Captive Insurance Agency.

(b)

The purpose of the Agency is to:

(1)

Provide medical malpractice liability insurance policies for health centers, including coverage for the staff, contractors, and volunteer service providers for the services provided at the health centers; and

(2)

Provide property insurance for District real property assets.

(c)

The liability of the Agency for medical malpractice liability and property insurance policies shall be limited to the funds in the Captive Trust Fund.

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 3, 55 DCR 6261
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1032(b), 60 DCR 12472

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the section.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Captive Earthquake Property Insurance Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-9, June 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6407, 20 DCSTAT 1277).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Captive Earthquake Property Insurance Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-39, March 20, 2013, 60 DCR 4663, 20 DCSTAT 523).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Captive Earthquake Property Insurance Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-85, June 19, 2013, 60 DCR 9536, 20 DCSTAT 1441).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 1031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle D of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Captive Insurance Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.